South Carolina, session 2025-2026, S52.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 56-5-2930 (A), (C), and (H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a person to drive a motor vehicle within this State while under the influence of alcohol to the extent that the person's faculties to drive a motor vehicle are materially and appreciably impaired, under the influence of any other drug, or a combination of other drugs or any other substances, to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue which cause impairment to the extent that the person's faculties to drive a motor vehicle are materially and appreciably impaired, or under the combined influence of alcohol and any other drug or drugs or substances, to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue which cause impairment to the extent that the person's faculties to drive a motor vehicle are materially and appreciably impaired. A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of the offense of driving under the influence and, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere, or forfeiture of bail must be punished as follows: (1) for a first offense, by a fine of four hundred dollars or imprisonment for not less than forty-eight hours nor more than thirty daysthen the person must be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not less than seventy-two hours nor more than thirty days, or both. The fine may not be suspended, Howeverhowever, in lieu of the forty-eightseventy-two hour minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for forty-eightseventy-two hours of public service employment. The minimum forty-eightseventy-two hour imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment in lieu of the minimum forty-eightseventy-two hour sentence. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not less than seventy-two hours nor more than thirty days. However, in lieu of the seventy-two-hour minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for seventy-two hours of public service employment. The minimum seventy-two-hour imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions as the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment in lieu of the minimum sentence. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars or imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days.  However, in lieu of the thirty-day minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for thirty days of public service employment. The minimum thirty days imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions as the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment instead of the thirty-day minimum sentence. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540, 22-3-545, and 22-3-550, a first offense charged for this item may be tried in magistrates court; (2) for a second offense, by a fine of not less than two thousand one hundred dollars nor more than five thousand one hundred dollars, and imprisonment for not less than five days nor more than one year then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than two years. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars; or. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than two years. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than three thousand five hundred dollars nor more than six thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than three years. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars.; (3) for a third offense, by a fine of not less than three thousand eight hundred dollars nor more than six thousand three hundred dollars, and imprisonment for not less than sixty days nor more than three years. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars nor more than seven thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than four years. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars and imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than five years; or (4)(3) for a fourth third or subsequent offense, by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by imprisonment for not less than two years nor more than six years. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by imprisonment for not less than three years nor more than seven years. (C) The fine for a first offense must not be suspended. The court is prohibited from suspending a monetary fine below that of the next preceding minimum monetary fine. A person who, while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, the combination of alcohol and drugs or any other substances, to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue, drives a motor vehicle and when driving a motor vehicle does any act forbidden by law or neglected any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately cause a collision that occurred while the person was driving in violation of this section, and resulted in bodily injury is guilty of the offense of driving under the influence, third degree, and, upon conviction, by a fine of not less than two thousand one  hundred dollars nor more than five thousand one hundred dollars, and imprisonment for not more than one year. A person who suffers a personal or financial injury because of a violation of the provisions of the section is considered the victim of the person convicted of the violation and must be afforded all rights enumerated in the Victim's Bill of Rights in the South Carolina Constitution, Article I, Section 24 including, but not limited to, reasonable access to all documents relating to the investigation. (H) A person convicted of violating this section, whether for a first offense or subsequent offense, must enroll in and successfully complete an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program certified by the Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services Office of Substance Use Services. The judge must order participation in a DUI victim impact panel including, but not limited to, one operated by an IRS-classified 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization approved by the Office of Substance Use Services, which may include online victim impact panels if approved by the office. The maximum fee for enrollment in the DUI victim impact panel shall not exceed seventy-five dollars subject to annual percentage increases not to exceed increases in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Department of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for South Carolina after year 2026. An assessment of the extent and nature of the alcohol and drug abuse problem of the applicant must be prepared and a plan of education or treatment, or both, must be developed for the applicant. The Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program shall determine if the applicant successfully has completed the services. The applicant must attend the first Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program available after the date of enrollment. The Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse ServicesOffice of Substance Use Services shall determine the cost of services provided by each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. Each applicant shall bear the cost of services recommended in the applicant's plan of education or treatment. The cost may not exceed five hundred one thousand dollars for education services, twofour thousand dollars for treatment services, and two thousand five hundred five thousand dollars in total for all services for each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. The cost for the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program is subject to annual percentage increases not to exceed increases in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Department of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for South Carolina after year 2026. An applicant may not be denied services due to an inability to pay. Inability to pay for services may not be used as a factor in determining if the applicant has successfully completed services. An applicant who is unable to pay for services shall perform fifty hours of community service as arranged by the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, which may use the completion of this community service as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. The court must be notified whether an offender failed to enroll in a certified program within thirty days or failed to participate in the plan of education or treatment. The court may hold the individual in contempt of court if the individual cannot show cause as to why no enrollment occurred within the mandated thirty days or why no progress has been made on the plan of education or treatment. SECTION 2.  Section 56-5-2930 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (M)(1) If a person is charged with violation of Section 56-5-2930 or Section 56-5-2933, the prosecuting authority shall review the person's criminal history and driving record to determine how many prior convictions as defined in subsection (D) are within the penalty enhancement period. (2) The prosecuting authority may thereafter proceed with a plea agreement that involves a reduction in charge only to the degree of an immediate lesser offense unless there are compelling reasons that justify a greater reduction. Any compelling reason for a greater reduction must be presented in court, and the court may not accept such a plea unless a judicial determination is made on the record that compelling reasons exist. SECTION 3.  Section 56-5-2933 (A), (C), and (H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) It is unlawful for a person to drive a motor vehicle within this State while his alcohol concentration is eight one-hundredths of one percent or more. A person who violates the provisions of this section is guilty of the offense of driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration and, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere, or forfeiture of bail must be punished as follows: (1) for a first offense, if the person's alcohol concentration is at least eight one-hundredths of one percent but less than ten one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of four hundred dollars or imprisonment for not less than forty-eight hours nor more than thirty days, or both. HoweverThe fine may not be suspended, however, in lieu of the forty-eight hour minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for forty-eight hours of public service employment. The minimum forty-eight hour imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment in lieu of the minimum forty-eight hour sentence. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of five hundred dollars or imprisonment for not less than seventy-two hours nor more than thirty days, or both. HoweverThe fine may not be suspended, however, in lieu of the seventy-two hour minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for seventy-two hours of public service employment. The minimum seventy-two hour imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions as the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment in lieu of the minimum sentence. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of one thousand dollars or imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than ninety days, or both. HoweverThe fine may not be suspended, however, in lieu of the thirty-day minimum imprisonment, the court may provide for thirty days of public service employment. The minimum thirty days imprisonment or public service employment must be served at a time when the person is not working and does not interfere with his regular employment under terms and conditions as the court considers proper. However, the court may not compel an offender to perform public service employment instead of the thirty-day minimum sentence. Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540, 22-3-545, and 22-3-550, a first offense charged for this item may be tried in magistrates court; (2) for a second offense, if the person's alcohol concentration is at least eight one-hundredths of one percent but less than ten one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand one hundred dollars nor more than five thousand one hundred dollars, and imprisonment for not less than five days nor more than one year. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than two thousand five hundred dollars nor more than five thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than thirty days nor more than two years. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than three thousand five hundred dollars nor more than six thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than three years. However, the fine imposed by this item must not be suspended in an amount less than one thousand one hundred dollars; or (3) for a third offense, by a fine of not less than three thousand eight hundred dollars nor more than six thousand three hundred dollars, and imprisonment for not less than sixty days nor more than three years. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than five thousand dollars nor more than seven thousand five hundred dollars and imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than four years. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by a fine of not less than seven thousand five hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand dollars and imprisonment for not less than six months nor more than five years.or (4)(3) for a fourth third or subsequent offense, if the person's alcohol concentration is at least eight one-hundredths of one percent but less than ten one-hundredths of a percent, then the person must be punished by imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than five years. If the person's alcohol concentration is at least ten one-hundredths of one percent but less than sixteen one-hundredths of one percent, then the person must be punished by imprisonment for not less than two years nor more than six years. If the person's alcohol concentration is sixteen one-hundredths of one percent or more, then the person must be punished by imprisonment for not less than three years nor more than seven years. (C) The fine for a first offense must not be suspended. The court is prohibited from suspending a monetary fine below that of the next preceding minimum monetary fine. A person who, while driving a vehicle while his alcohol concentration is eight one-hundreths of one percent or more and while driving a vehicle did any act forbidden by law or neglected any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately cause a collision that resulted in bodily injury and occurred while the person was driving in violation of this section, is guilty of the offense of driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration, third degree, and, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty or of nolo contendere, or forfeiture of bail must be punished by a fine not less than two thousand one hundred dollars nor more than five thousand one hundred dollars and imprisonment not more than one year. A person who suffers a personal or financial injury because of a violation of the provisions of the section is considered the victim of the person convicted of the violation and must be afforded all rights enumerated in the Victim's Bill of Rights in the South Carolina Constitution, Article I, Section 24, including, but not limited to, reasonable access to all documents relating to the investigation. (H) A person convicted of violating this section, whether for a first offense or subsequent offense, must enroll in and successfully complete an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program certified by the Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services Office of Substance Use Services, and the judge must order participation in a DUI victim impact panel including, but not limited to, one operated by an IRS-classified 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization approved by the Office of Substance Use Services, which may include online victim impact panels if approved by the office. An assessment of the extent and nature of the alcohol and drug abuse problem of the applicant must be prepared and a plan of education or treatment, or both, must be developed for the applicant. The Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program shall determine if the applicant successfully has completed the services. The applicant must attend the first Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program available after the date of enrollment. The Department of Alcohol and Other Drug Abuse Services Office of Substance Use Services shall determine the cost of services provided by each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. Each applicant shall bear the cost of services recommended in the applicant's plan of education or treatment. The cost may not exceed five hundred  one thousand dollars for education services, two four thousand dollars for treatment services, and two thousand five hundred five thousand dollars in total for all services for each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. The cost for the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program is subject to annual percentage increases not to exceed increases in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Department of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for South Carolina after 2026. The maximum fee for enrollment in the DUI victim impact panel shall not exceed seventy-five dollars subject to annual percentage increases not to exceed increases in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Department of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for South Carolina after year 2026. An applicant may not be denied services due to an inability to pay. Inability to pay for services may not be used as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. An applicant who is unable to pay for services shall perform fifty hours of community service as arranged by the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, which may use the completion of this community service as a factor in determining if the applicant successfully has completed services. The court must be notified whether an offender failed to enroll in a certified program within thirty days or failed to participate in the plan of education or treatment. The court may hold the individual in contempt of court if the individual cannot show cause as to why no enrollment occurred within the mandated thirty days or why no progress has been made on the plan of education or treatment. SECTION 4.  Section 56-5-2933 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: (M)(1) If a person is charged with violation of Section 56-5-2930 or Section 56-5-2933, the prosecuting authority shall review the person's criminal history and driving record to determine how many prior convictions as defined in subsection (D) are within the penalty enhancement period. (2) The prosecuting authority may thereafter proceed with a plea agreement that involves a reduction in charge only to the degree of an immediate lesser offense unless there are compelling reasons that justify a greater reduction. Any compelling reason for a greater reduction must be presented in court, and the court may not accept such a plea unless a judicial determination is made on the record that compelling reasons exist. SECTION 5.  Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-2940. (A) A circuit solicitor must become the prosecuting authority for a first or second offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or a first or second offense violation of Section 56-5-2933 immediately upon receiving notice from the county clerk of court. The circuit solicitor may assume the prosecution of a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2933 pending in municipal court. (B) There is established and designated in each of the counties of this State a magistrates centralized court to have jurisdiction over all magistrate level offenses occurring: (1) within the unincorporated areas of the county involving a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2933; (2) within all areas of the county involving a second offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or a second offense violation of Section 56-5-2933; (3) within all areas of the county any other magistrate level offenses as determined by the circuit solicitor; or (4) within the incorporated areas of the county, provided the solicitor has notified the municipal court and the municipal attorney, where applicable, that the solicitor will assume prosecution of a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or a first offense violation of Section 56-5-2933. (C) The county clerk shall forward the arrest warrant or charging documents for a first or second offense violation of Section 56-5-2930, a first or second offense violation of Section 56-5-2933, or any other magistrate level offenses as determined by the circuit solicitor in subsection (B)(3) occurring within the county's jurisdiction to the solicitor of the judicial circuit. (D) Pursuant to Article V, Section 4 of the Constitution of South Carolina, the Chief Justice of the South Carolina Supreme Court may appoint a master-in-equity to sit in the magistrates centralized court  for the purpose of presiding over cases involving violations of Section 56-5-2930 or violations of Section 56-5-2933. SECTION 6.  Section 56-5-2941(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall require a person who is convicted of violating the provisions of Sections 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, 56-5-2945, 56-5-2947 except if the conviction was for Section 56-5-750, or a law of another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, or other drugs or substances, or who is issued a temporary alcohol license pursuant to Section 56-1-286 or 56-5-2951, to have installed on any motor vehicle the person drives, except a moped or motorcycle, an ignition interlock device designed to prevent driving of the motor vehicle if the person has consumed alcoholic beverages. This requirement shall not apply to a person who submitted to a breath test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and had an alcohol concentration of .00 one-hundredths of one percent. (2) The department may waive the requirements of this section if the department determines that the person has a medical condition that makes the person incapable of properly operating the installed device.  If the department grants a medical waiver, the department shall suspend the person's driver's license for the length of time that the person would have been required to hold an ignition interlock restricted license.  The department may withdraw the waiver at any time that the department becomes aware that the person's medical condition has improved to the extent that the person has become capable of properly operating an installed device. (3) The department also shall require a person who has enrolled in the Ignition Interlock Device Program in lieu of the remainder of a driver's license suspension, denial of license to operate a vehicle as an habitual offender pursuant to Section 56-1-1090, or denial of the issuance of a driver's license or permit to have an ignition interlock device installed on any motor vehicle the person drives, except a moped or motorcycle. (4) The length of time that a device is required to be affixed to a motor vehicle is set forth in Section 56-1-286; 56-1-1090; 56-5-2945; 56-5-2951; 56-5-2990; or 56-5-2947, except if the conviction was for Section 56-5-750. (5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require installation of an ignition interlock device until the suspension is upheld at a contested case hearing or the contested hearing is waived. SECTION 7.  Section 56-5-2941(L) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (L)(1) A person who is required in the course and scope of the person's employment to drive a motor vehicle owned by the person's employer may drive the employer's motor vehicle without installation of an ignition interlock device, provided that the person's use of the employer's motor vehicle is solely for the employer's business purposes. (2) This subsection does not apply to: (a) a person convicted of a second or subsequent violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, 56-5-2945, or a law of another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, or other drugs or substances, unless the person's driving privileges have been suspended for not less than one year or the person has had an ignition interlock device installed for not less than one year on each of the motor vehicles owned or operated, or both, by the person; (b) a person who is self-employed or to a person who is employed by a business owned in whole or in part by the person or a member of the person's household or immediate family unless during the defense of a criminal charge, the court finds that the vehicle's ownership by the business serves a legitimate business purpose and that titling and registration of the vehicle by the business was not done to circumvent the intent of this section; or (c) a person participating in the Ignition Interlock Device Program as an habitual offender pursuant to Section 56-1-1090(A). (3) Whenever the person operates the employer's vehicle pursuant to this subsection, the person shall have with the person a copy of the Department of Motor Vehicles' form specified by Section 56-1-400(B). (4) This subsection will be construed in parallel with the requirements of Section 56-1-400(B).  A waiver issued pursuant to this subsection will be subject to the same review and revocation as described in Section 56-1-400(B). SECTION 8.  Section 56-5-2945 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2945. (A) A person who, while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, the combination of alcohol and drugs or any substances to include tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue, drives a motor vehicle and when driving a motor vehicle does any act forbidden by law or neglects any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately causes moderate bodily injury to another person or damage to real or personal property of another valued at over twenty-five thousand dollars, is guilty of the offense of  felony driving under the influence, second degree, and, upon conviction, must be punished by a mandatory fine of not less than three thousand dollars nor more than six thousand dollars and mandatory imprisonment for not less than ninety days nor more than ten years. (B) A person who, while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or the a combination of alcohol and drugs or any other substances, to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue, drives a motor vehicle and when driving a motor vehicle does any act forbidden by law or neglects any duty imposed by law in the driving of the motor vehicle, which act or neglect proximately causes great bodily injury or death to another person, is guilty of the offense of felony driving under the influence, first degree, and, upon conviction, must be punished: (1) by a mandatory fine of not less than five thousand one hundred dollars nor more than ten thousand one hundred dollars and mandatory imprisonment for not less than thirty days six months nor more than fifteen years when great bodily injury results; (2) by a mandatory fine of not less than ten thousand one hundred dollars nor more than twenty-five thousand one hundred dollars and mandatory imprisonment for not less than one year nor more than twenty-five years when death results. (C) A part of the mandatory sentences required to be imposed by this section must not be suspended, and probation must not be granted for any portion. If a person is sentenced to a mandatory minimum sentence pursuant to subsection (A) or subsection (B)(1), the person may be confined to his place of residence pursuant to the Home Detention Act for the duration of the sentence. (B)(D) As used in this section, "great bodily injury" means bodily injury which creates a substantial risk of death or which causes serious, permanent disfigurement, or protracted loss or impairment of the function of any bodily member or organ. As used in this chapter, "moderate bodily injury" means physical injury that involves prolonged loss of consciousness, or that causes temporary or moderate disfigurement or temporary loss of the function of a bodily member or organ, or injury that requires medical treatment when the treatment requires the use of general anesthesia or injury that results in a fracture or dislocation.  Moderate bodily injury does not include a one-time treatment and subsequent observation of scratches, cuts, abrasions, bruises, burns, splinters, or any other injuries that do not ordinarily require extensive medical care. (C)(E)(1) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the driver's license of a person who is convicted pursuant to this section.  For suspension purposes of this section, convictions arising out of a single incident must run concurrently. (2) After the person is released from prison, the person shall enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941, end the suspension, and obtain an ignition interlock restricted license pursuant to Section 56-1-400. The ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle for: (a) three years when great bodily injury results and five years when a death occurs; or (b) one year when the conviction was for felony DUI, second degree. (D)(F) One hundred dollars of each fine imposed pursuant to this section must be placed by the Comptroller General into a special restricted account to be used by the Department of Public Safety for the Highway Patrol. SECTION 9.  Section 56-5-2947(A) and (D) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A) A person eighteen years of age or older is guilty of child endangerment when: (1) the person violates: (a) Section 56-5-750; (b) Section 56-5-293056-5-2910; (c) Section 56-5-293356-5-2920; or (d) Section 56-5-294556-5-2930; and (e) Section 56-5-2933; or (f) Section 56-5-2945; and (2) the person has one or more passengers younger than sixteen years of age in the motor vehicle when the violation occurs. If more than one passenger younger than sixteen years of age is in the vehicle when a violation occurs, the person may be charged with only one violation of this section. (D)(1) In addition to imposing the penalties for offenses listed in subsection (A)(1) and the penalties contained in subsection (B), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person's driver's license for sixty days upon conviction under subsection (A)(1)(a). Upon conviction under subsection (A)(1)(b) through (d), the Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the person's driver's license. (2) Upon conviction under subsection (A)(1)(b)(d) through (d)(f), the person shall enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941, end the suspension, and obtain an ignition interlock restricted license pursuant to Section 56-1-400. The ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle for three months. (3) Sections 56-1-1320 and 56-5-2990 as they relate to enrollment in an alcohol and drug safety action program and to the issuance of a provisional driver's license will not be effective until the ignition interlock restricted license period is completed. SECTION 10. Section 56-5-2950 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2950. (A) A person who drives a motor vehicle in this State is considered to have given consent to chemical tests of the person's breath, blood, or urine for the purpose of determining the presence of alcohol, drugs, or the combination of alcohol and drugs, or other substances to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue if arrested for an offense arising out of acts alleged to have been committed while the person was driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of alcohol and drugs or any other substances to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue. A breath testAny breath or blood testing must be administered at the direction of a law enforcement officer who has arrested a person for driving a motor vehicle in this State while under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of alcohol and drugs or any other substances to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue. (1) At If the officer has reasonable suspicion to believe the person is under the influence of alcohol, at the direction of the arresting officer, the person first must be offered a breath test to determine the person's alcohol concentration. If However, if the person is physically unable to provide an acceptable breath sample because the person has an injured mouth, is unconscious or dead, or for any other reason considered acceptable by the licensed medical personnel, the person is being evaluated or treated at a medically licensed facility, the arresting officer may request a blood sample to be taken without first offering a breath test. If the officer has reasonable suspicion that the person is under the influence of drugs other than alcohol, or is under the influence of a combination of alcohol and drugs, the officer may order that a urine sample be taken for testing. A breath sample taken for testing must be collected within two hours of the arrest. Any additional tests to collect other samples taken with the timely consent of the person must be collected within three hours of the arrest. The breath test must be administered by a person trained and certified by the South Carolina Criminal Justice Academy, pursuant to SLED policies. Before the breath test is administered, an eight one-hundredths of one percent simulator test must be performed and the result must reflect a reading between 0.076 percent and 0.084 percent. (2) If the officer has reasonable suspicion that the person is under the influence of drugs other than alcohol, a combination of alcohol and drugs or any other substances to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue, the officer may request that the person submit a blood sample for testing. Such a request may be made with, or without first offering a breath test.  A request for a blood sample may also be made after a breath sample has been provided if the officer has reasonable suspicion that the person is under the influence of drugs or other substances , other than alcohol, to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue. Blood samples taken with the consent of the person must be collected within three hours of the arrest unless exigent circumstances prevent collection of the samples within the three-hour period. Blood and urine samples must be obtained by physicians licensed by the State Board of Medical Examiners a licensed physician, or a registered nurse licensed by the State Board of Nursing, a certified phlebotomist, ornurses licensed by the State Board of Nursing, and other medical personnel trained to obtain the samples in a licensed medical facility. The arresting officer shall not draw or obtain the blood sample. Blood and urine samples must be obtained and handled in accordance with procedures approved by SLED and may be collected anywhere the Department of Public Health and the trained person who is collecting the sample determine is reasonable and adheres to the medical industry standard of safety and quality procedures. (B) No tests may be administered or samples obtained unless, upon activation of the video recording equipment and prior to the commencement of the testing procedure, the person has been given a written copy of and verbally informed that: (1) the person does not have to take the test or give the samples, but that the person's privilege to drive must be suspended or denied for at least six months one year with the option of ending the suspension if the person enrolls in the Ignition Interlock Device Program, if the person refuses to submit to the test, and that the person's refusal may be used against the person in court; (2) the person's privilege to drive must be suspended for at least one month ninety days with the option of ending the suspension if the person enrolls in the Ignition Interlock Device Program, if the person takes the test or gives the samples and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; (3) the person has the right to have a qualified person of the person's own choosing conduct additional independent tests at the person's expense; (4) the person has the right to request a contested case hearing within thirty days of the issuance of the notice of suspension; and (5) if the person does not request a contested case hearing or if the person's suspension is upheld at the contested case hearing, the person shall enroll in an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. (C) A hospital, physician, qualified technician, chemist, phlebotomist, emergency medical technician, or registered nurse, or any other trained medical personnel who obtains the samples or conducts the test or participates in the process of obtaining the samples or conducting the test in accordance with this section is not subject to a cause of action for assault, battery, or another cause alleging that the drawing of blood or taking samples at the request of the arrested person or a law enforcement officer was wrongful. This release from liability does not reduce the standard of medical care required of the person obtaining the samples or conducting the test. This qualified release also applies to the employer of the person who conducts the test or obtains the samples. (D) The person tested or giving samples for testing may have a qualified person of the person's own choosing conduct additional tests at the person''s expense and must be notified in writing of that right. A person's request or failure to request additional blood or urine tests is not admissible against the person in the criminal trial. The failure or inability of the person tested to obtain additional tests does not preclude the admission of evidence relating to the tests or samples obtained at the direction of the law enforcement officer. (E) If the person provides the requested samples and thereafter requests assistance to obtain additional  tests, The the arresting officer shall provide affirmative assistance to the person to contact a qualified person to conduct and obtain additional tests. Affirmative assistance, at a minimum, includes providing transportation for the person to the nearest medical facility which performs blood tests to determine a person's alcohol concentration. If the medical facility obtains the blood sample but refuses or fails to test the blood sample to determine the person's alcohol concentration, SLED shall test the blood sample and provide the result to the person and to the arresting officer. Failure to provide affirmative assistance upon request to obtain additional tests when required by this subsection bars the admissibility of the breath test result in a judicial or administrative proceeding. The arresting officer is not required to provide affirmative assistance if the person refuses to provide the requested sample provided for by subsection (A). SLED shall administer the provisions of this subsection and shall make regulations necessary to carry out this subsection's provisions. The costs of the tests administered at the direction of the law enforcement officer must be paid from the state's general fund. However, if the person is subsequently convicted of violating Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945, then, upon conviction, the person shall pay twenty-five dollars for the costs of the tests. The twenty-five dollars must be placed by the Comptroller General into a special restricted account to be used by the State Law Enforcement Division to offset the costs of administration of the breath testing devices, breath testing site video program, and toxicology laboratory. (F) A qualified person who obtains samples or administers the tests or assists in obtaining samples or the administration of tests at the direction of a law enforcement officer is released from civil and criminal liability unless the obtaining of samples or tests is performed in a negligent, reckless, or fraudulent manner. No person may be required by the arresting officer, or by another law enforcement officer, to obtain or take any sample of blood or urine. (G) In the criminal prosecution for a violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945 the alcohol concentration at the time of the test, as shown by chemical analysis of the person's breath or other body fluids, gives rise to the following: (1) if the alcohol concentration was at that time five one-hundredths of one percent or less, it is conclusively presumed that the person was not under the influence of alcohol; (2) if the alcohol concentration was at that time in excess of five one-hundredths of one percent but less than eight one-hundredths of one percent, this fact does not give rise to any inference that the person was or was not under the influence of alcohol, but this fact may be considered with other evidence in determining the guilt or innocence of the person;  or (3) (2) if the alcohol concentration was at that time eight one-hundredths of one percent or more, it may be inferred that the person was under the influence of alcohol. The provisions of this section must not be construed as limiting the introduction of any other evidence bearing upon the question of whether or not the person was under the influence of alcohol, drugs, or a combination of alcohol and drugs or other substances to include but not limited to tetrahydrocannabinol or tetrahydrocannabinol analogue. (H) A person who is unconscious or otherwise in a condition rendering the person incapable of refusal is considered to be informed and not to have withdrawn the consent provided by subsection (A) of this section. (I) A person required to submit to tests by the arresting law enforcement officer must be provided with a written report including the time of arrest, the time of the tests, and the results of the tests before any trial or other proceeding in which the results of the tests are used as evidence. A person who obtains additional tests shall furnish a copy of the time, method, and results of such tests to the officer before a trial, hearing, or other proceeding in which the person attempts to use the results of the additional tests as evidence. (J)(I) Policies, procedures, and regulations promulgated by SLED may be reviewed by the trial judge or hearing officer on motion of either party. The failure to follow policies, procedures, and regulations, or the provisions of this section, shall result in the exclusion from evidence of any test results, if the trial judge or hearing officer finds that this failure materially affected the accuracy or reliability of the test results or the fairness of the testing procedure and the court trial judge or hearing officer rules specifically as to the manner in which the failure materially affected the accuracy or reliability of the test results or the fairness of the procedure. (K)(J) If a state employee charged with the maintenance of breath testing devices in this State and the administration of breath testing policy is required to testify at a contested case hearing or court proceeding, the entity employing the witness may charge a reasonable fee to the defendant for such services if summoned for court at the request of the defendant. SECTION 11. Section 56-5-2951 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2951. (A) The Department of Motor Vehicles shall suspend the driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege of, or deny the issuance of a license or permit to, a person who drives a motor vehicle and refuses to submit to a test provided for in Section 56-5-2950 or has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more. The arresting officer shall issue a notice of suspension which is effective beginning on the date of the alleged violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945 and provide a copy of the notice to the person. (B)(1) Within thirty days of the issuance of the notice of suspension, the person may: (a) request a contested case hearing before the Office of Motor Vehicle Hearings pursuant to its rules of procedure; and, either: (b) enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941; or (c) obtain a temporary alcohol license with an ignition interlock device restriction pursuant to Section 56-1-400 from the Department of Motor Vehicles.  A one hundred dollar fee must be assessed for obtaining a temporary alcohol license and such fee must be held in trust by the Department of Motor Vehicles until final disposition of any contested case hearing.  If a final disposition of the matter has not occurred within ninety days of the request of the contested case hearing, the Department of Motor Vehicles shall remove the ignition interlock device restriction pending the final disposition of the contested case hearing. If the person asks for a continuance which delays the hearing, the ignition interlock device restriction shall be extended for an additional ninety days.  Should the temporary suspension provided for in this subsection be upheld during the contested case hearing, twenty-five dollars of the fee must be distributed by the Department of Motor Vehicles to the Department of Public Safety for supplying and maintaining all necessary vehicle videotaping equipment, while the remaining seventy-five dollars must be placed by the Comptroller General into the State Highway Fund as established by Section 57-11-20, to be distributed as provided in Section 11-43-167.  The temporary alcohol license allows the person to drive without any restrictive conditions pending the outcome of the contested case hearing provided for in subsection (F), this section, or the final decision or disposition of the matter. If the suspension is upheld at the contested case hearing, the temporary alcohol license remains in effect until the Office of Motor Vehicle Hearings issues the hearing officer's decision and the Department of Motor Vehicles sends notice to the person pursuant to subsection (H). (2) At the contested case hearing, if: (a) the suspension is upheld, the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be suspended or the person must be denied the issuance of a license or permit for the remainder of the suspension period provided for in subsection (I).  Within thirty days of the issuance of the notice that the suspension has been upheld, the person shall enroll in an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2990 and must enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941 for any suspension time still remaining; (b) the suspension is overturned, the person must have the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege reinstated and the person must be reimbursed by the Department of Motor Vehicles in the amount of the fees provided for in subsection (B)(1)(c). (3) If the suspension is overturned, the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be reinstated. (4) The provisions of this subsection do not affect the trial for a violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945. (C) The period of suspension provided for in subsection (I) begins on the day the notice of suspension is issued, or at the expiration of any other suspensions, and continues until the person applies for a temporary alcohol license and requests a contested case hearing. (D) If a person does not request a contested case hearing, the person waives the person's right to the hearing, and the person's suspension must not be stayed but continues for the period provided for in subsection (I). (E)(1) The notice of suspension must advise the person: (1)(a) of the person's right to obtain a temporary alcohol driver's license and to request a contested case hearing before the Office of Motor Vehicle Hearings; (2)(b) that, if the person does not request a contested case hearing within thirty days of the issuance of the notice of suspension, the person waives the person's right to the contested case hearing, and the suspension continues for the period provided for in subsection (I); and (3)(c) that, if the suspension is upheld at the contested case hearing or the person does not request a contested case hearing, the person shall enroll in an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program. (2) Following the advisement, the arresting officer must electronically submit the notice to the Department of Motor Vehicles. The suspension begins upon the electronic submission of the notice. The arresting officer is not required to confiscate the person's driver's license. The person is not required to return the license to the Department of Motor Vehicles. (F)(1) A contested case hearing must be held after the request for the hearing is received by the Office of Motor Vehicle Hearings.  The scope of the hearing is limited to whether the person: (a) was lawfully arrested or detained; (b) was given a written copy of and verbally informed of the rights enumerated in Section 56-5-2950; (c) refused to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950; or (d) consented to taking a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, and the: (i) reported alcohol concentration at the time of testing was fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; (ii) individual who administered the test or took samples was qualified pursuant to Section 56-5-2950; (iii) tests administered and samples obtained were conducted pursuant to Section 56-5-2950; and (iv) machine was working properly. (2) Nothing in this section prohibits the introduction of evidence at the contested case hearing on the issue of the accuracy of the breath test result. (3) A written order must be issued to all parties either reversing or upholding the suspension of the person's license, permit, or nonresident's operating privilege, or denying the issuance of a license or permit.  If the suspension is upheld, the person must receive credit for the number of days the person's license was suspended before the person received a temporary alcohol license and requested the contested case hearing and must receive credit for the number of days, if any, the person maintained an ignition interlock restriction on the temporary alcohol license. (4) The Department of Motor Vehicles and the arresting officer shall have the burden of proof in contested case hearings conducted pursuant to this section. If neither the Department of Motor Vehicles nor the arresting officer appears at the contested case hearing, the hearing officer shall rescind the suspension of the person's license, permit, or nonresident's operating privilege regardless of whether the person requesting the contested case hearing or the person's attorney appears at the contested case hearing. (G) A contested case hearing is governed by the Administrative Procedures Act, and a person has a right to appeal the decision of the hearing officer pursuant to that act to the Administrative Law Court in accordance with the Administrative Law Court's appellate rules.  The filing of an appeal stays the suspension until a final decision is issued on appeal. (H) If the person did not request a contested case hearing or the suspension is upheld at the contested case hearing, the person shall enroll in an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2990. (I)(1) Except as provided in item (3), the period of a driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege suspension for, or denial of issuance of a license or permit to, an arrested person who has no previous convictions for violating Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945, or a law of another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or other drugs or substances within the ten years preceding a violation of this section, and who has had no previous suspension imposed pursuant to Section 56-1-286, 56-5-2951, or 56-5-2990, within the ten years preceding a violation of this section is: (a) six months one year for a person who refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950; or (b) one month two months for a person who takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more. (2) The period of a driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege suspension for, or denial of issuance of a license or permit to, a person who has been convicted previously for violating Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945, or another law of this State or another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol or another drug or substance within the ten years preceding a violation of this section, or who has had a previous suspension imposed pursuant to Section 56-1-286, 56-5-2951, or 56-5-2990, within the ten years preceding a violation of this section is: (a) for a second offense, nine months two years if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or two four months if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; (b) for a third offense, twelve months three years if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or three six months if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more; and (c) for a fourth or subsequent offense, fifteen months four years if the person refuses to submit to a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950, or four eight months if the person takes a test pursuant to Section 56-5-2950 and has an alcohol concentration of fifteen one-hundredths of one percent or more. (3)(a) In lieu of serving the remainder of a suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit, a person may enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941, end the suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit, and obtain an ignition interlock restricted license pursuant to Section 56-1-400.  The ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle equal to the length of time remaining on the person's suspension or denial of the issuance of a license or permit.  If the length of time remaining is less than three months, the ignition interlock device is required to be affixed to the motor vehicle for three months. (b) The person must receive credit for the number of days the person maintained an ignition interlock restriction on the temporary alcohol license. (c) Once a person has enrolled in the Ignition Interlock Device Program and obtained an ignition interlock restricted license, the person is subject to Section 56-5-2941 and cannot subsequently choose to serve the suspension. (J) A person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be restored when the person's period of suspension or ignition interlock restricted license requirement pursuant to subsection (I) has concluded, even if the person has not yet completed the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program.  After the person's driving privilege is restored, the person shall continue the services of the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program.  If the person withdraws from or in any way stops making satisfactory progress toward the completion of the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, the person's license must be suspended until the completion of the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program.  A person shall be attending or have completed an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2990 before the person's driving privilege can be restored at the conclusion of the suspension period or ignition interlock restricted license requirement. (K) When a nonresident's privilege to drive a motor vehicle in this State has been suspended pursuant to the provisions of this section, the department shall give written notice of the action taken to the motor vehicle administrator of the state of the person's residence and of any state in which the person has a  license or permit. (L) The department shall not suspend the privilege to drive of a person under the age of twenty-one pursuant to Section 56-1-286, if the person's privilege to drive has been suspended pursuant to this section arising from the same incident. (M) A person whose driver's license or permit is suspended pursuant to this section is not required to file proof of financial responsibility. (N) An insurer shall not increase premiums on, add surcharges to, or cancel the automobile insurance of a person charged with a violation of Section 56-1-286, 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, 56-5-2945, or a law of another state that prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle while under the influence of alcohol, or other drugs or substances based solely on the violation unless the person is convicted of the violation. (O) The department shall administer the provisions of this section. (P) Nothing in this section shall prevent the prosecuting authority from waiving or dismissing the charge. SECTION 12. Section 56-5-2953 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2953. (A) A person who violates Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945 must have his conduct at the incident site and the breath test site video recorded. The State may comply with the video recording requirement by offering into evidence one or more video recordings, or by establishing that one or more of the exceptions provided for in subsection (B) applies. (1)(a) The video Video recording at the incident site must: (i) not begin later than the activation of the officer's blue lights; (ii) include any field sobriety tests administered; and (iii) include the arrest of a person for a violation of Section 56-5-2930 or Section 56-5-2933, or a probable cause determination in that the person violated Section 56-5-2945, and show the person being advised of his Miranda rights. (iii) reasonably document the advisement of Miranda rights if Miranda warnings are given. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require the giving of Miranda warnings unless the state attempts to introduce statements made in response to a custodial interrogation. (b) A refusal to take a field sobriety test does not constitute disobeying a police command. (2) The If a breath test is administered, video recording at the breath test site must: (a) include the entire breath test procedure, the person being informed that he is being video recorded, and that he has the right to refuse the test; (b) include the person taking or refusing the breath test and the actions of the breath test operator while conducting the test; and (c) also include the person's conduct during the required twenty-minute pre-test waiting period, unless the officer submits a sworn affidavit certifying that it was physically impossible to video record this waiting period. (3) The video recordings of made at the incident site, in the law enforcement vehicle, on a body worn camera, and of at the breath test site are admissible pursuant to the South Carolina Rules of Evidence in a criminal, administrative, or civil proceeding by any party to the action. (B)(1) Nothing in this section may be construed as prohibiting the introduction of other relevant evidence in the trial of a violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945. A violation of this section is not grounds for the dismissal of a violation of Section 56-5-2930, Section 56-5-2933, or Section 56-5-2945. (2) Failure by the arresting officer to produce  the video recording required by this section is not alone a ground for dismissal of any charge made pursuant to a video recording that substantially complies with the recording requirements of this section may be grounds for the suppression of evidence that was not properly recorded or documented as set forth in this section in any trial for a violation of Section 56-5-2930, 56-5-2933, or 56-5-2945 if unless the arresting officer submits a sworn affidavit certifying that the video recording equipment at the time of the arrest or probable cause determination, or video equipment at the breath test facility was in an inoperable condition, stating which reasonable efforts have been made to maintain the equipment in an operable condition, and certifying that there was no other operable breath test facility available in the county or, in the alternative, submits a sworn affidavit certifying that it was physically impossible to produce the video recording because the person needed emergency medical treatment, or exigent circumstances existed. In circumstances including, but not limited to, road blocksroadblocks, traffic accident investigations, and citizens' arrests, where an arrest has been made and the video recording equipment has not been activated by blue lights, the failure by the arresting officer to produce the video recordings required by this section is not alone a ground for dismissal the suppression of evidence. However, as soon as video recording is practicable in these circumstances, video recording must begin as soon as practicable and thereafter must conform with the provisions of this section. Nothing in this section prohibits the court from considering any other valid reason for the failure to produce the of the State to substantially comply with any video recording requirements based upon the totality of the circumstances; nor do the provisions of this section prohibit the person from offering evidence relating to the arresting law enforcement officer's failure to produce the video recording. (3) The court must view all relevant portions of any video recordings before making a ruling on suppression of evidence or testimony. (C) A video recording must not be disposed of in any manner except for its transfer to a master recording for consolidation purposes until the results of any legal proceeding in which it may be involved are finally determined. (D) SLED is responsible for purchasing, maintaining, and supplying all necessary video recording equipment for use at the breath test sites. SLED also is responsible for monitoring all breath test sites to ensure the proper maintenance of video recording equipment. The Department of Public Safety is responsible for purchasing, maintaining, and supplying all videotaping equipment for use in all law enforcement vehicles used for traffic enforcement. The Department of Public Safety also is responsible for monitoring all law enforcement vehicles used for traffic enforcement to ensure proper maintenance of video recording equipment. (E) Beginning one month from the effective date of this section, all of the funds received in accordance with Section 14-1-208(C)(9) must be expended by SLED to equip all breath test sites with video recording devices and supplies. Once all breath test sites have been equipped fully with video recording devices and supplies, eighty-seven and one-half percent of the funds received in accordance with Section 14-1-208(C)(9) must be expended by the Department of Public Safety to purchase, maintain, and supply video recording equipment for vehicles used for traffic enforcement. The remaining twelve and one-half percent of the funds received in accordance with Section 14-1-208(C)(9) must be expended by SLED to purchase, maintain, and supply video recording equipment for the breath test sites. Funds must be distributed by the State Treasurer to the Department of Public Safety and SLED on a monthly basis. The Department of Public Safety and SLED are authorized to carry forward any unexpended funds received in accordance with Section 14-1-208(C)(9) as of June thirtieth of each year and to expend these carried forward funds for the purchase, maintenance, and supply of video recording equipment. The Department of Public Safety and SLED must report the revenue received under this section and the expenditures for which the revenue was used as required in the department''s and SLED's annual appropriation request to the General Assembly. (F) The Department of Public Safety and SLED must promulgate regulations necessary to implement the provisions of this section. (G) The provisions contained in Section 56-5-2953(A), (B), and (C) take effect for each law enforcement vehicle used for traffic enforcement once the law enforcement vehicle is equipped with a video recording device. The provisions contained in Section 56-5-2953(A), (B), and (C) take effect for a breath test site once the breath test site is equipped with a video recording device. SECTION 13. Section 56-5-2920 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 56-5-2920. (A) Any A person who drives any vehicle in such a manner as to indicate either a wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property is guilty of reckless driving.  The Department of Motor Vehicles, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of the conviction, of the entry of a plea of guilty or the forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a second and subsequent offense for the violation of this section shall forthwith suspend the driver's license of any such person for a period of three months. Only those offenses which occurred within a period of five years including and immediately preceding the date of the last offense shall constitute prior offenses within the meaning of this section.  Any person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, entry of a plea of guilty or forfeiture of bail, be punished by a fine of not less than twenty-five dollars nor more than two hundred dollars or by imprisonment for not more than thirty days. (B) A person who drives any vehicle in such a manner as to indicate either a wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property and causes great bodily injury, as defined in Section 56-5-2945(B), to another is guilty of misdemeanor reckless driving and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more than two thousand five hundred dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than five years, or both. (C) A person who drives any vehicle in such a manner as to indicate either a wilful or wanton disregard for the safety of persons or property and causes moderate bodily injury, as defined in Section 56-5-2945, to another is guilty of misdemeanor reckless driving resulting in moderate bodily injury and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars nor more one thousand dollars, or by imprisonment for not more than three years, or both. (D) The Department of Motor Vehicles, upon receiving satisfactory evidence of the conviction, of the entry of a plea of guilty, or the forfeiture of bail of any person charged with a second and subsequent offense of the violation of this section shall suspend the driver's license of any such person for a period of three months. Only those offenses which occurred within a period of five years including and immediately preceding the date of the last offense shall constitute prior offenses within the meaning of this section. (E) Prosecution under this section does not prevent the charging and prosecution under any other section or chapter. SECTION 14.       Article 23, Chapter 5, Title 56 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 56-5-2960. (A) As used in this section: (1) "disabled" means a legal disability as is measured by functional inabilities; and includes inabilities caused by psychological, psychiatric, or stress-related trauma, and refers to any person seventeen years of age or older who is unable to make informed decisions with respect to his or her personal affairs to the extent that he or she lacks the capacity to provide for his or her physical health and safety or the physical health and safety of a minor child including, but not limited to, healthcare, food, shelter, clothing, or personal hygiene; and (2) "totally and permanently disabled" means the inability to do any substantial gainful activity by reason of any medically determinable physical or mental impairment which can be expected to result in death or which has lasted or can be expected to last for a continuous period of not less than twelve months; and includes a finding of permanent total disability by the Social Security Administration that a person is disabled and qualifies for benefits or a finding by an administrative law judge. (B)(1) If a defendant is convicted of a violation of Section 56-5-2945(B) and the violation caused the death of a parent or guardian of a minor child or dependent or resulted in a finding by the court that a parent or guardian of a minor child or dependent is disabled or totally and permanently disabled, then the sentencing court may order the defendant to pay restitution in the form of financial support for the child or dependent to each child or dependent of the victim for the duration of any probationary sentence and/or community supervision until the child or dependent reaches eighteen years of age, or nineteen years of age if the child or dependent is still enrolled in high school. (2) In determining an amount that is reasonable and necessary for the financial support of the victim's child or dependent, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including the: (a) financial needs and resources of the child or dependent; (b) financial resources and needs of the surviving parent or guardian of the child or dependent; (c) standard of living to which the child or dependent is accustomed; (d) physical and emotional condition of the child or dependent and the child's or dependent's educational needs; (e) child's or dependent's physical and legal custody arrangements; and (f) reasonable childcare expenses of the surviving parent or guardian. (C)(1) If the surviving parent or guardian of the child or dependent brings a civil action against the defendant before the sentencing court orders restitution to financially support the child or dependent and the surviving parent or guardian obtains a judgment and full satisfaction of damages in the civil suit, restitution shall not be ordered under this section. (2) If the court orders the defendant to pay restitution to financially support the child or dependent under this section and the surviving parent or guardian subsequently brings a civil action and obtains a judgment, the restitution order shall be offset by the amount of the judgment awarded and paid by the defendant or the defendant's insurance for lost wages or permanent impairment of the power to work and earn money in the civil action. SECTION 15. Section 56-5-2990(C) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (C) The Office of Substance Use Services shall determine the cost of services provided by each certified Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program.  Each person shall bear the cost of services recommended in the person's plan of education or treatment.  The cost may not exceed five hundred one thousand dollars for education services, two four thousand dollars for treatment services, and two thousand five hundred  five thousand dollars in total for all services.  No person may be denied services due to an inability to pay.  The cost for the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program is subject to the annual percentage increases not to exceed increases in the Consumer Price Index as reported by the Department of Labor Statistics, Consumer Price Index for South Carolina after year 2026. Inability to pay for services may not be used as a factor in determining if the person has successfully completed services.  A person who is unable to pay for services shall perform fifty hours of community service as arranged by the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, which may use the completion of this community service as a factor in determining if the person has successfully completed services.  The Office of Substance Use Services shall report annually to the House Ways and Means Committee and Senate Finance Committee on the number of first and multiple offenders completing the Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, the amount of fees collected and expenses incurred by each Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program, and the number of community service hours performed in lieu of payment. SECTION 16. Section 56-1-286(L) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (L)(1) Within thirty days of the issuance of the notice of suspension the person may: (a) request a contested case hearing before the Office of Motor Vehicle Hearings pursuant to its rules of procedure; and, either: (b) enroll in the Ignition Interlock Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941; or (c) obtain a temporary alcohol license with an ignition interlock restriction pursuant to Section 56-1-400 from the Department of Motor Vehicles. A one hundred dollar fee must be assessed for obtaining a temporary alcohol license. Twenty-five dollars of the fee must be distributed to the Department of Public Safety for supplying and maintaining all necessary vehicle videotaping equipment.  The remaining seventy-five dollars must be placed by the Comptroller General into the State Highway Fund as established by Section 57-11-20, to be distributed as provided in Section 11-43-167.  The temporary alcohol license allows the person to drive a motor vehicle pending the outcome of the contested case hearing provided for in this section or the final decision or disposition of the matter. (2) The ignition interlock restriction must be maintained on the temporary alcohol license for three months. If the contested case hearing has not reached a final disposition by the time the ignition interlock restriction has been removed, then the person can obtain a temporary alcohol license without an ignition interlock restriction. (3) At the contested case hearing, if: (a) the suspension is upheld, the person shall enroll in an Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program and the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be suspended or the person must be denied the issuance of a license or permit for the remainder of the suspension periods provided for in subsections (F) and (G); andor (b) the person must enroll in the Ignition Device Program pursuant to Section 56-5-2941 the suspension is overturned, the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be reinstated. (4) If the suspension is overturned, the person's driver's license, permit, or nonresident operating privilege must be reinstated. SECTION 17. Section 56-1-400(H) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (H) Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a person to obtain an ignition interlock device unless one or more of the offenses that resulted in the suspension were alcohol related. SECTION 18. Section 1-7-406 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 1-7-406. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, each judicial circuit of this State, in addition to its other assistant solicitors, shall have one three assistant solicitor solicitors and one investigator who shall be full-time employees.  Such assistant solicitor solicitors and investigator for each circuit shall be appointed by the solicitor of that circuit, shall serve at his pleasure and shall have such responsibilities as the solicitor directs.  The circuit solicitor shall designate assistant prosecutors to prosecute the offenses of driving under the influence and driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration in the various courts. The compensation of each such assistant solicitor and investigator or such other staff as may be designated by each solicitor for his circuit and related employment expenses shall be as provided by the General Assembly in the annual general appropriations act.  Nothing contained herein shall prohibit the funds so provided for such staff to be designated by the solicitor as being utilized with local and federal funds. SECTION 19. Section 17-22-50 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-22-50.  (A) A person must not be considered for intervention if: (1) he previously has been accepted into an intervention program;  or (2) the person is charged with: (a) blackmail; (b) driving under the influence or driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration more than first offense or if driving with a current Class A, B, or C commercial driver's license; (c) a traffic-related offense which is punishable only by fine or loss of points; (d) a fish, game, wildlife, or commercial fishery-related offense which is punishable by a loss of eighteen points as provided in Section 50-9-1120; (e) a crime of violence as defined in Section 16-1-60;  or (f) an offense contained in Chapter 25 of Title 16 if the offender has been convicted previously of a violation of that chapter or a similar offense in another jurisdiction. (B) However, this section does not apply if the solicitor determines the elements of the crime do not fit the charge. SECTION 20. Chapter 22, Title 17 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 17-22-58.  In addition to any other intervention program requirement, a condition of admission to the pretrial intervention program of a person charged with driving under the influence first offense or driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration first offense, must participate and complete a DUI victim impact panel, as defined in Section 56-5-2930(H), have a breath alcohol ignition interlock device installed for six months, monitored by the ignition interlock program of the Department of Probation, Parole and Pardon Services, and participate and complete the South Carolina Alcohol and Drug Safety Action Program "ADSAP". SECTION 21. Section 17-22-130 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 17-22-130. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 17-1-40, in all cases where an offender is accepted for intervention a report must be made and retained on file in the solicitor's office, regardless of whether or not the offender successfully completes the intervention program.  All reports must be retained on file in the solicitor's office for a period of two years after successful completion, two years after rejection, or two years after unsuccessful completion of the program.  After the retention of these reports for two years, they may be destroyed.  The circuit solicitor shall furnish to the South Carolina Law Enforcement Division personal identification information and criminal offense on each person who applies for intervention, is subsequently accepted or rejected and successfully or unsuccessfully completes the program. The division shall maintain this database and shall not destroy any information contained therein. This information may only be used by the division and the State Coordinator's Office in those cases where a circuit solicitor, magistrate, municipal judge, or municipal prosecutor inquires as to whether a person has previously been accepted in an intervention program. However, that information may be confidentially released to the State Coordinator's Office to assist in compiling annual reports.  The identification information on any defendant must not be under any circumstances released as public knowledge. SECTION 22. Section 22-3-545 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 22-3-545.  (A) Notwithstanding the provisions of Sections 22-3-540 and 22-3-550, a criminal case, the penalty for which the crime in the case does not exceed five thousand five hundred dollars or one year imprisonment, or both, either as originally charged or as charged pursuant to the terms of a plea agreement, may be transferred from general sessions court if the provisions of this section are followed. (B)(1) The solicitor, upon ten days' written notice to the defendant, may petition a circuit court judge in the circuit to transfer one or more cases from the general sessions court docket to a docket of a magistrates or municipal court in the circuit for disposition. The solicitor's notice must fully apprise the defendant of his right to have his case heard in general sessions court. The notice must include the difference in jury size in magistrates or municipal court and in general sessions court. The case may be transferred from the general sessions court unless the defendant objects after notification by the solicitor pursuant to the provisions of this item. The objection may be made orally or in writing at any time prior to the trial of the case or prior to the entry of a guilty plea. The objection may be made to the chief judge for administrative purposes in the judicial circuit where the charges are pending, the trial judge, or the solicitor. Before impaneling the jury or accepting the guilty plea of the defendant, the trial judge must receive an affirmative waiver by the defendant, if present, of his right to have the case tried in general sessions court. The defendant must be informed that, if tried in general sessions court, the case would be tried in front of twelve jurors who must reach a unanimous verdict before a finding of guilty of the offense can be rendered in his case, and that if tried in magistrates or municipal court, the case would be tried in front of six jurors who must reach a unanimous verdict before a finding of guilty of the offense can be reached in his case. The defendant may waive any and all of the rights provided in this subsection, in writing, prior to the impaneling of the jury or the acceptance of the defendant's guilty plea. (2) A case transferred to a magistrates or municipal court not disposed of in one hundred eighty days from the date of transfer automatically reverts to the docket of the general sessions court, except for violations of Section 56-5-2930 and Section 56-5-2933. (C) All cases transferred to the magistrates or municipal court must be prosecuted by the solicitor's office. The chief magistrate of the county or the chief municipal judge of the municipality, upon petition of the solicitor, shall set the terms of court and order the magistrates and municipal judges to hold terms of court on specific times and dates for the disposition of these cases. (D) Provision for an adequate record must be made by the solicitor's office. (E) Notwithstanding another provision of law, all fines and assessments imposed by a magistrate or municipal judge presiding pursuant to this section must be distributed as if the fine and assessment were imposed by a circuit court pursuant to Sections 14-1-205 and 14-1-206. This section must not result in increased compensation to a magistrate presiding over a trial or hearing pursuant to this section or in other additional or increased costs to the county. SECTION 23. Beginning on July 31, 2027, the Office of Court Administration shall submit an annual report to the House and Senate Judiciary Committees and to the Judicial Merit Selection Commission on the number of driving under the influence violations charged pursuant to Section 56-5-2930, the number of driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration violations charged pursuant to Section 56-5-2933, and the number of felony driving under the influence violations charged pursuant to Section 56-5-2945, for the preceding fiscal year. The report must include the disposition, the circuit in which the disposition occurred, and the name of the judge presiding over the case. SECTION 24. Section 16-1-60 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 16-1-60. (A) For purposes of definition under South Carolina law, a violent crime includes the offenses of:  murder (Section 16-3-10);  attempted murder (Section 16-3-29);  assault and battery by mob, first degree, resulting in death (Section 16-3-210(B)), criminal sexual conduct in the first and second degree (Sections 16-3-652 and 16-3-653);  criminal sexual conduct with minors, first, second, and third degree (Section 16-3-655);  assault with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct, first and second degree (Section 16-3-656); assault and battery with intent to kill (Section 16-3-620);  assault and battery of a high and aggravated nature (Section 16-3-600(B));  kidnapping (Section 16-3-910);  trafficking in persons (Section 16-3-2020);  voluntary manslaughter (Section 16-3-50);  armed robbery (Section 16-11-330(A)); attempted armed robbery (Section 16-11-330(B));  carjacking (Section 16-3-1075);  drug trafficking as defined in Section 44-53-370(e) or trafficking cocaine base as defined in Section 44-53-375(C);  manufacturing or trafficking methamphetamine as defined in Section 44-53-375;  arson in the first degree (Section 16-11-110(A));  arson in the second degree (Section 16-11-110(B)); burglary in the first degree (Section 16-11-311);  burglary in the second degree (Section 16-11-312(B));  engaging a child for a sexual performance (Section 16-3-810);  homicide by child abuse (Section 16-3-85(A)(1));  aiding and abetting homicide by child abuse (Section 16-3-85(A)(2));  inflicting great bodily injury upon a child (Section 16-3-95(A));  allowing great bodily injury to be inflicted upon a child (Section 16-3-95(B));  domestic violence of a high and aggravated nature (Section 16-25-65);  domestic violence in the first degree (Section 16-25-20(B));  abuse or neglect of a vulnerable adult resulting in death (Section 43-35-85(F));  abuse or neglect of a vulnerable adult resulting in great bodily injury (Section 43-35-85(E));  taking of a hostage by an inmate (Section 24-13-450);  detonating a destructive device upon the capitol grounds resulting in death with malice (Section 10-11-325(B)(1)); spousal sexual battery (Section 16-3-615);  producing, directing, or promoting sexual performance by a child (Section 16-3-820);  sexual exploitation of a minor first degree (Section 16-15-395);  sexual exploitation of a minor second degree (Section 16-15-405);  promoting prostitution of a minor (Section 16-15-415);  participating in prostitution of a minor (Section 16-15-425); aggravated voyeurism (Section 16-17-470(C));  detonating a destructive device resulting in death with malice (Section 16-23-720(A)(1));  detonating a destructive device resulting in death without malice (Section 16-23-720(A)(2));  boating under the influence resulting in death (Section 50-21-113(A)(2));  vessel operator's failure to render assistance resulting in death (Section 50-21-130(A)(3));  damaging an airport facility or removing equipment resulting in death (Section 55-1-30(3));  failure to stop when signaled by a law enforcement vehicle resulting in death (Section 56-5-750(C)(2));  interference with traffic-control devices, railroad signs, or signals resulting in death (Section 56-5-1030(B)(3));  hit and run resulting in death (Section 56-5-1210(A)(3));  felony driving under the influence or felony driving with an unlawful alcohol concentration resulting in death (Section 56-5-2945(A)(B)(2)); putting destructive or injurious materials on a highway resulting in death (Section 57-7-20(D));  obstruction of a railroad resulting in death (Section 58-17-4090);  accessory before the fact to commit any of the above offenses (Section 16-1-40);  and attempt to commit any of the above offenses (Section 16-1-80). Only those offenses specifically enumerated in this section are considered violent offenses. (B) At the time of sentencing for a conviction of Section 50-21-113(A)(2) or Section 56-5-2945(B)(2), the judge may suspend the designation of violent offense and must include findings on the record documenting the departure from Section 16-1-60(A) for this conviction. The Department of Corrections may allow the person to participate in work programs, education, and rehabilitation that he would not otherwise be eligible for due to the conviction for Section 50-21-113(A)(2) or Section 56-5-2945(B)(2). However, the person shall not accumulate credit for time for his participation. The judge may not order a departure if the person has additional convictions before the judge that are violent offenses. For a person serving an active sentence as of the effective date of this subsection, the person may petition the circuit court where the conviction occurred to remove the designation of violent offense from his record, provided the victim's family consents and the only violent offense on his record is Section 50-21-113(A)(2) or Section 56-5-2945(B)(2). The person must petition the court prior to his release. SECTION 25. Section 22-2-190 of the S.C. Code is amended to read: Section 22-2-190.  The following jury areas for magistrates courts in the various counties of the State are established: (1) Abbeville County (a)(1) Abbeville (2) Calhoun Falls (3) Lowndesville (4) Antreville (5) Due West (6) Donalds (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-01-13, and on copies filed with the Abbeville County magistrates offices, and available on the Abbeville County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Abbeville County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (2) Aiken County (a)(1) North Augusta (2) Langley (3) Aiken (4) New Ellenton (5) Wagner/Monetta (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-03-13, and on copies filed with the Aiken County magistrates offices, and available on the Aiken County website. (c) Each magistrate's office must be maintained at a place designated by the Aiken County Legislative Delegation. (d) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Aiken County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (3) Allendale County One jury area countywide. (4) Anderson County One jury area countywide. (5) Bamberg County One jury area countywide. (6) Barnwell County (a) The boundaries for the magistrates jury areas in Barnwell are defined by the boundaries of the Barnwell school districts. (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-11-13, and on copies filed with the Barnwell County magistrates offices, and available on the Barnwell County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Barnwell County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (7) Beaufort County (a)(1) Sheldon (2) Bluffton (3) Daufuskie (4) Hilton Head (5) Beaufort (6) St. Helena (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-13-13, and on copies filed with the Beaufort County magistrates offices, and available on the Beaufort County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Beaufort County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (8) Berkeley County (a)(1) Goose Creek (2) Jamestown (3) St. Stephen (4) Moncks Corner (5) Summerville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-15-13, and on copies filed with the Berkeley County magistrates offices, and available on the Berkeley County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Berkeley County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (9) Calhoun County One jury area countywide. (10) Charleston County (a)(1) Jury Area No. 1:  St. Paul's/Edisto (2) Jury Area No. 2:  West Ashley (3) Jury Area No. 3:  Charleston (4) Jury Area No. 4:  North Charleston (5) Jury Area No. 5:  Mount Pleasant (6) Jury Area No. 6:  St. Andrews (7) Jury Area No. 7:  McClellanville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-19-13, and on copies filed with the Charleston County magistrates offices, and available on the Charleston County website. (c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, magistrates in Charleston County shall reside in the following jury areas: (1) Three magistrates shall reside in Jury Area No. 1, one of whom shall reside on Edisto Island. (2) Three magistrates shall reside in Jury Area No. 2, one of whom shall reside on each of the following islands:  Johns Island, James Island and Wadmalaw Island. (3) Two magistrates shall reside in Jury Area No. 3. (4) Three magistrates shall reside in Jury Area No. 4. (5) One magistrate shall reside in Jury Area No. 5. (6) One magistrate shall reside in Jury Area No. 6. (7) One magistrate shall reside in Jury Area No. 7. (d) The magistrate system in Charleston County must be so organized in order to provide for centralized magistrates courts for the purpose of facilitating and expediting civil and criminal matters as hereinafter provided: (1) The centralized magistrates courts have concurrent jurisdiction for civil and criminal matters with the existing magistrates of Charleston County. Plaintiffs in civil matters have the right to commence a case in either a central magistrates court or in a magistrates court within a defined jury area. The defendant in a magisterial civil matter may remove the case either from a central magistrates court to the defined jury area in which the defendant resides or the defendant may remove the case from the defined jury area in which he resides to a central magistrates court. This removal must be by notification to the court of origin and no cause for removal must be shown. (2) The centralized magistrates courts have jurisdiction over any type or form of civil or criminal matter, including any procedural or substantive matter or preliminary hearing or examination or bond or bail hearing or any other criminal proceeding. (3) The fees and charges for the central magistrates courts are the same as those prevailing in all magistrates courts whether central or in a defined jury area. (4) Upon the effective date of this paragraph a central magistrates court must be established in the City of Charleston. (5) Six months after the effective date of this paragraph a central magistrates court must be established in the City of North Charleston. However, if the central magistrates court in the City of North Charleston is not funded and established as required by this subsubitem, then the central magistrates court in the City of Charleston established pursuant to subsubitem (4) must cease to exist until the time the central magistrates court in the City of North Charleston is so funded and established. (6) A third central magistrates court must be established at the time and in the location which a majority of the members of the General Assembly residing in Charleston County determines. In addition to those magistrates assigned to the seven jury areas, there must be appointed one magistrate from the county at large without regard to residence in a particular jury area who must serve as the magistrate of the central magistrates court in the City of Charleston. Six months after the effective date of this paragraph a second magistrate must be appointed from the county at large without regard to residence in a particular jury area who must serve as the magistrate of the central magistrates court in the City of North Charleston. A third magistrate also must be appointed at the time as provided in this subsubitem from the county at large without regard to residence in a particular jury area who, when appointed, must serve as the magistrate of the central magistrates court established pursuant to this subsubitem. (e) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Charleston County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (11) Cherokee County One jury area countywide. (12) Chester County (a)(1) Baton Rouge (2) Chester (3) Fort Lawn (4) Great Falls (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-23-13, and on copies filed with the Chester County magistrates offices, and available on the Chester County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Chester County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (13) Chesterfield County One jury area countywide. (14) Clarendon County One jury area countywide. (15) Colleton County One jury area countywide. (16) Darlington County (a)(1) Society Hill (2) Darlington (3) Lamar (4) Lydia (5) Hartsville. (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-31-13, and on copies filed with the Darlington County magistrates offices, and available on the Darlington County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Darlington County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (17) Dillon County (a)(1) Hamer (2) Dillon (3) Lake View (4) Latta (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-33-13, and on copies filed with the Dillon County magistrates offices, and available on the Dillon County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Dillon County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (18) Dorchester County (a)(1) St. George (2) Summerville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-35-13, and on copies filed with the Dorchester County magistrates offices, and available on the Dorchester County website. (c) Criminal cases and traffic offenses shall be tried in the jury area where the offense was committed, notwithstanding the creation of any uniform court for the trial of certain offenses. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Dorchester County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (19) Edgefield County One jury area countywide. (20) Fairfield County One jury area countywide. (21) Florence County (a)(1) Florence (2) Timmonsville (3) Evergreen (4) Olanta (5) Coward (6) Pamplico (7) Lake City (8) Hannah (9) Johnsonville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-41-13, and on copies filed with the Florence County magistrates offices, and available on the Florence County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Florence County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (22) Georgetown County (a)(1) Andrews (2) Georgetown (3) Pleasant Hill (4) Pawleys Island (5) Murrells Inlet (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-43-13, and on copies filed with the Georgetown County magistrates offices, and available on the Georgetown County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Georgetown County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (23) Greenville County (a)(1) Tigerville (2) Greenville (3) Taylors (4) Simpsonville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-45-13, and on copies filed with the Greenville County magistrates offices, and available on the Greenville County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Greenville County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (24) Greenwood County One jury area countywide. (25) Hampton County (a)(1) North (2) South (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-49-13, and on copies filed with the Hampton County magistrates offices, and available on the Hampton County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Hampton County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (26) Horry County (a)(1) Aynor (2) Conway (3) Myrtle Beach (4) Little River (5) Simpson Creek (6) Bayboro (7) Green Sea (8) Floyd (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-51-13, and on copies filed with the Horry County magistrates offices, and available on the Horry County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Horry County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (27) Jasper County One jury area countywide. (28) Kershaw County One jury area countywide. (29) Lancaster County One jury area countywide. (30) Laurens County One jury area countywide. (31) Lee County (a)(1) No. 1-Lucknow (2) No. 2-Stokes Bridge (3) No. 3-Cypress (4) No. 4-Bishopville (5) No. 5-Ionia (6) No. 6-Spring Hill (7) No. 7-Ashwood (8) No. 8-St. Charles (9) No. 9-Lynchburg (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-61-13, and on copies filed with the Lee County magistrates offices, and available on the Lee County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Lee County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (32) Lexington County (a)(1) Irmo/Chapin (2) Lexington (3) Cayce/West Columbia (4) South Congaree (5) Bateburg/Leesville (6) Swansea (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-63-13, and on copies filed with the Lexington County magistrates offices, and available on the Lexington County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Lexington County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (33) Marion County (a)(1) Marion (2) Mullins (3) Nichols (4) Legette (5) Britton's Neck (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-67-13, and on copies filed with the Marion County magistrates offices, and available on the Marion County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Marion County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (34) Marlboro County (a)(1) Bennettsville (2) McColl (3) Clio (4) Brownsville (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-69-13, and on copies filed with the Marlboro County magistrates offices, and available on the Marlboro County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Marlboro County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (35) McCormick County One jury area countywide. (36) Newberry County One jury area countywide. (37) Oconee County One jury area countywide. (38) Orangeburg County (a)(1) West (2) Central (3) East (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-75-13, and on copies filed with the Orangeburg County magistrates offices, and available on the Orangeburg County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Orangeburg County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (39) Pickens County One jury area countywide. (40) Richland County (a)(1) Blythewood (2) Columbia (3) Dentsville (4) Dutch Fork (5) Eastover (6) Hopkins (7) Lykesland (8) Olympia (9) Pontiac (10) Upper Township (11) Waverly (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document M-79-12, and on copies filed with the Richland County Department of Planning and Development Services, and available on the Richland County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the Richland County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (41) Saluda County One jury area countywide. (42) Spartanburg County One jury area countywide. (43) Sumter County One jury area countywide. (44) Union County (a)(1) Jonesville (2) Pinckney (3) Bogansville (4) Union (5) Santuc (6) Cross Keys (7) Goshen Hill (8) Fishdam (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-87-13, and on copies filed with the Union County magistrates offices, and available on the Union County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Union County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (45) Williamsburg County (a)(1) Kingstree (2) Hemingway (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Office of Research and Statistics of the South Carolina Budget and Control Board designated as document M-89-13, and on copies filed with the Williamsburg County magistrates offices, and available on the Williamsburg County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), the Williamsburg County Magistrates Centralized Court: One jury area countywide. (46) York County (a)(1) Clover (2) Fort Mill (3) Rock Hill (4) Western York County (5) York (b) The lines defining the magistrates jury areas provided in subitem (a) are as shown on the official map on file with the Revenue and Fiscal Affairs Office designated as document M-91-12, and on copies filed with the York County Management Information Systems Department, and available on the York County website. (c) Notwithstanding the provisions of subitem (a), for the York County Centralized DUI Court: One jury area countywide. SECTION 26. The Department of Insurance shall conduct a study on the feasibility of the creation of a product that would introduce an "impaired driver accountability bond" to the insurance market. This bond would be in addition to the required SR-22 insurance in Section 38-77-140 and would require all drivers who are convicted of a second or subsequent offense violation of Section 56-5-2930 or Section 56-5-2933 to maintain the bond for a period of three years. The Department must issue a report of their findings to the Senate, the House of Representatives, and the Governor by December 31, 2026. SECTION 27. The repeal or amendment by this act of any law, whether temporary or permanent or civil or criminal, does not affect pending actions, rights, duties, or liabilities founded thereon, or alter, discharge, release or extinguish any penalty, forfeiture, or liability incurred under the repealed or amended law, unless the repealed or amended provision shall so expressly provide.  After the effective date of this act, all laws repealed or amended by this act must be taken and treated as remaining in full force and effect for the purpose of sustaining any pending or vested right, civil action, special proceeding, criminal prosecution, or appeal existing as of the effective date of this act, and for the enforcement of rights, duties, penalties, forfeitures, and liabilities as they stood under the repealed or amended laws. SECTION 28. If any section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, or word of this act is for any reason held to be unconstitutional or invalid, such holding shall not affect the constitutionality or validity of the remaining portions of this act, the General Assembly hereby declaring that it would have passed this act, and each and every section, subsection, paragraph, subparagraph, sentence, clause, phrase, and word thereof, irrespective of the fact that any one or more other sections, subsections, paragraphs, subparagraphs, sentences, clauses, phrases, or words hereof may be declared to be unconstitutional, invalid, or otherwise ineffective. SECTION 29. This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor, except for SECTIONS 6, 8, 9, 10, 11, 13, 16, and 17, which take effect on December 31, 2026. ----XX----